Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202539-1355
Road materials; equipment; office accommodations; storage buildings; department's authority and responsibility; limitations.

(1) The department shall have authority to:

(a) Purchase, lease, employ, or acquire by other means, all needed road materials, machinery, equipment, supplies, services, and labor necessary for the construction, reconstruction, maintenance, and control of the state highway system and all tools and materials necessary to keep such machinery and equipment in repair; and

(b) Lease, purchase, construct, or cause to be constructed, buildings for office accommodations, which are necessary in the administration of the duties of the department, and buildings for the storing and housing of materials, machinery, equipment, and supplies.

(2) The department shall not construct or cause to be constructed any building with an estimated cost greater than the adjusted dollar amount established for capital construction projects in section 81-1114.01 without the consent of the Legislature.

(3) The maintenance, protection, and control of the materials, machinery, equipment, supplies, tools, and buildings shall be under the authority and responsibility of the department.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 55, p. 441;

Laws 2025, LB323, § 2.